Maryland, session 2025, HB0286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–201.
(A) (1) THE PLANNING PRINCIPLES UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION ARE COLLECTIVELY INTENDED TO CREATE SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES
AND TO PROTECT THE ENVIRONMENT IN ORDER TO FOSTER A HIGH QUALITY OF LIFE
FOR ALL RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
(2) TO ACCOMPLISH THE GOALS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, RESIDENTS SHOULD BE ACTIVE PARTNERS IN THE PLANNING AND
– 1 –

Ch. 63 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
IMPLEMENTATION OF COMMUNITY INITIATIVES AND SENSITIVE TO THEIR
RESPONSIBILITIES AS STEWARDS IN BALANCING AND ACHIEVING COMMUNITY
GOALS.
(B) In addition to the requirements of § 3–201(a) and (b) of this article, a planning
commission shall implement the following [visions] PLANNING PRINCIPLES through the
comprehensive plan described in Title 3 of this article:
[(1) quality of life and sustainability: a high quality of life is achieved
through universal stewardship of the land, water, and air resulting in sustainable
communities and protection of the environment;
(2) public participation: citizens are active partners in the planning and
implementation of community initiatives and are sensitive to their responsibilities in
achieving community goals;
(3) growth areas: growth is concentrated in existing population and
business centers, growth areas adjacent to these centers, or strategically selected new
centers;
(4) community design: compact, mixed–use, walkable design consistent
with existing community character and located near available or planned transit options is
encouraged to ensure efficient use of land and transportation resources and preservation
and enhancement of natural systems, open spaces, recreational areas, and historical,
cultural, and archaeological resources;
(5) infrastructure: growth areas have the water resources and
infrastructure to accommodate population and business expansion in an orderly, efficient,
and environmentally sustainable manner;
(6) transportation: a well–maintained, multimodal transportation system
facilitates the safe, convenient, affordable, and efficient movement of people, goods, and
services within and between population and business centers;
(7) housing: a range of housing densities, types, and sizes provides
residential options for citizens of all ages and incomes;
(8) economic development: economic development and natural
resource–based businesses that promote employment opportunities for all income levels
within the capacity of the State’s natural resources, public services, and public facilities are
encouraged;
(9) environmental protection: land and water resources, including the
Chesapeake and coastal bays, are carefully managed to restore and maintain healthy air
and water, natural systems, and living resources;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 63
(10) resource conservation: waterways, forests, agricultural areas, open
space, natural systems, and scenic areas are conserved;
(11) stewardship: government, business entities, and residents are
responsible for the creation of sustainable communities by collaborating to balance efficient
growth with resource protection; and
(12) implementation: strategies, policies, programs, and funding for growth
and development, resource conservation, infrastructure, and transportation are integrated
across the local, regional, State, and interstate levels to achieve these visions.]
(1) LAND: OPTIMIZE LAND PRODUCTIVITY OF WORKING LANDSCAPES,
INCLUDING FARMS AND FORESTS, AND FISHERIES, AND PRIORITIZE DEVELOPMENT
WITHIN POPULATION CENTERS AND THAT ARE IN PROXIMITY TO EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES;
(2) TRANSPORTATION: PRIORITIZE TRANSPORTATION NETWORKS
THAT CREATE ENERGY EFFICIENT, AFFORDABLE, AND RELIABLE ACCESS TO JOBS,
HOUSING, AND SERVICES;
(3) HOUSING: ENABLE A MIX OF QUALITY HOUSING TYPES AND
AFFORDABILITY OPTIONS TO ACCOMMODATE ALL WHO WANT TO LIVE IN THE STATE;
(4) ECONOMY: ALLOW FOR ADAPTIVE REUSE, MIXED–USE, AND
CONTEXT APPROPRIATE NEW DEVELOPMENT THAT RESPONDS TO CHANGING
MARKETS AND INNOVATIONS;
(5) EQUITY: ENGAGE ALL SECTORS OF THE COMMUNITY IN PLAN
DEVELOPMENT TO ENSURE DIVERSE VOICES ARE HEARD AND THE NEEDS OF
UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS ARE PRIORITIZED;
(6) RESILIENCE: INTEGRATE RESILIENCY MEASURES THAT WILL
MINIMIZE THE IMPACTS OF RAPID AND UNEXPECTED NATURAL– AND
HUMAN–CAUSED THREATS ON COMMUNITIES;
(7) PLACE: PROVIDE FOR PUBLIC SPACES THAT ENCOURAGE SOCIAL
INTERACTION AND VALUE CULTURAL, HISTORICAL, AND NATURAL RESOURCES; AND
(8) ECOLOGY: PROTECT AND RESTORE SENSITIVE ECOLOGICAL
SYSTEMS AND CONSERVE NATURAL RESOURCES, INCLUDING FORESTS,
AGRICULTURAL AREAS, AND WATERWAYS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
– 3 –

Ch. 63 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5–7A–01.
The State Economic Growth, Resource Protection, and Planning Policy [is the
following] CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING PLANNING PRINCIPLES FOR ADVANCING
SUSTAINABLE GROWTH IN THE STATE:
[(1) quality of life and sustainability: a high quality of life is achieved
through universal stewardship of the land, water, and air resulting in sustainable
communities and protection of the environment;
(2) public participation: citizens are active partners in the planning and
implementation of community initiatives and are sensitive to their responsibilities in
achieving community goals;
(3) growth areas: growth is concentrated in existing population and
business centers, growth areas adjacent to these centers, or strategically selected new
centers;
(4) community design: compact, mixed–use, walkable design consistent
with existing community character and located near available or planned transit options is
encouraged to ensure efficient use of land and transportation resources and preservation
and enhancement of natural systems, open spaces, recreational areas, and historical,
cultural, and archeological resources;
(5) infrastructure: growth areas have the water resources and
infrastructure to accommodate population and business expansion in an orderly, efficient,
and environmentally sustainable manner;
(6) transportation: a well–maintained, multimodal transportation system
facilitates the safe, convenient, affordable, and efficient movement of people, goods, and
services within and between population and business centers;
(7) housing: a range of housing densities, types, and sizes provides
residential options for citizens of all ages and incomes;
(8) economic development: economic development and natural
resource–based businesses that promote employment opportunities for all income levels
within the capacity of the State’s natural resources, public services, and public facilities are
encouraged;
(9) environmental protection: land and water resources, including the
Chesapeake and coastal bays, are carefully managed to restore and maintain healthy air
and water, natural systems, and living resources;
(10) resource conservation: waterways, forests, agricultural areas, open
space, natural systems, and scenic areas are conserved;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 63
(11) stewardship: government, business entities, and residents are
responsible for the creation of sustainable communities by collaborating to balance efficient
growth with resource protection; and
(12) implementation: strategies, policies, programs, and funding for growth
and development, resource conservation, infrastructure, and transportation are integrated
across the local, regional, State, and interstate levels to achieve these visions.]
(1) LAND: OPTIMIZE LAND PRODUCTIVITY OF WORKING LANDSCAPES,
INCLUDING FARMS AND FORESTS, AND FISHERIES, AND PRIORITIZE DEVELOPMENT
WITHIN POPULATION CENTERS AND THAT ARE IN PROXIMITY TO EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES;
(2) TRANSPORTATION: PRIORITIZE TRANSPORTATION NETWORKS
THAT CREATE ENERGY EFFICIENT, AFFORDABLE, AND RELIABLE ACCESS TO JOBS,
HOUSING, AND SERVICES;
(3) HOUSING: ENABLE A MIX OF QUALITY HOUSING TYPES AND
AFFORDABILITY OPTIONS TO ACCOMMODATE ALL WHO WANT TO LIVE IN THE STATE;
(4) ECONOMY: ALLOW FOR ADAPTIVE REUSE, MIXED–USE, AND
CONTEXT APPROPRIATE NEW DEVELOPMENT THAT RESPONDS TO CHANGING
MARKETS AND INNOVATIONS;
(5) EQUITY: ENGAGE ALL SECTORS OF THE COMMUNITY IN PLAN
DEVELOPMENT TO ENSURE DIVERSE VOICES ARE HEARD AND THE NEEDS OF
UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS ARE PRIORITIZED;
(6) RESILIENCE: INTEGRATE RESILIENCY MEASURES THAT WILL
MINIMIZE THE IMPACTS OF RAPID AND UNEXPECTED NATURAL– AND
HUMAN–CAUSED THREATS ON COMMUNITIES;
(7) PLACE: PROVIDE FOR PUBLIC SPACES THAT ENCOURAGE SOCIAL
INTERACTION AND VALUE CULTURAL, HISTORICAL, AND NATURAL RESOURCES; AND
(8) ECOLOGY: PROTECT AND RESTORE SENSITIVE ECOLOGICAL
SYSTEMS AND CONSERVE NATURAL RESOURCES, INCLUDING FORESTS,
AGRICULTURAL AREAS, AND WATERWAYS.
5–7B–05.
(a) (3) The Board of Public Works may approve a transportation project under
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection if the transportation project:
– 5 –

Ch. 63 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) maintains the existing transportation system, if the Department
of Transportation and the Department of Planning determine the project does not serve to
significantly increase highway capacity;
(ii) serves to connect priority funding areas, if:
1. the Department of Transportation and the Department of
Planning determine that adequate access control or other measures are in place to:
A. prevent development that is inconsistent with §
[5–7A–01(1), (2), and (3)] 5–7A–01 of this title; and
B. maintain the viability of the project while concomitantly
constraining development which potentially detracts from main street business areas; and
2. the Department of Transportation and the Department of
Planning have first determined whether alternative transportation modes, such as mass
transit and transportation demand management, provide a reasonable alternative to the
project and that no reasonable alternative exists;
(iii) has the sole purpose of providing control of access by the
Department of Transportation along an existing highway corridor; or
(iv) due to its operational or physical characteristics, must be located
away from other development.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 6 –